Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2338.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-1958 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 65-1958. (a) Any person may apply to the Kansas state
board of cosmetology for a demonstration temporary location or
temporary guest artist permit. Any such application shall be on a form
and in a manner approved by the board and accompanied by the fee
established under K.S.A. 65-1950, and amendments thereto.
(b) (1) The board may grant a temporary location permit to a
person authorized under K.S.A. 65-1940 through 65-1954, and
amendments thereto. If a person who applies for a temporary location
permit is not licensed in this state, the board may grant a temporary
location permit if:
(A) Such person is licensed to practice such profession regulated
under K.S.A. 65-1940 through 65-1954, and amendments thereto, in
another state or jurisdiction; and
(B) such license has not been revoked, suspended or conditioned
from the practice of such profession.
(2) The board may grant a demonstration temporary guest artist
permit to a person to provide services authorized under K.S.A. 65-1940
through 65-1954, and amendments thereto, at a state or national
convention, an establishment licensed by the Kansas state board of
cosmetology or any other event location approved by the board. If a
person who applies for a demonstration temporary guest artist permit
to provide such services is not licensed in this state, the board may
grant a demonstration temporary guest artist permit if:
(A) Such person is licensed to practice such profession regulated
under K.S.A. 65-1940 through 65-1954, and amendments thereto, in
another state or jurisdiction; and
(B) such license has not been revoked, suspended or conditioned
from the practice of such profession.
(2)(3) If an application for a demonstration temporary location or
temporary guest artist permit is submitted by a citizen of a foreign
country who has not been issued a social security number and who has
not nor been licensed by any other state, the board shall not require the
applicant to submit a social security number and shall instead accept a
valid visa or passport identification number.
(3) (4) Any demonstration temporary location or temporary
guest artist permit issued under this section shall expire not later than
14 days after issuance of by the board.
(c) The board shall adopt rules and regulations as necessary to
implement and administer this section. Such rules and regulations shall
be adopted on or before December 31, 2023.
(d) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to K.S.A. 65-
1940 through 65-1954, and amendments thereto.

HOUSE BILL No. 2338—page 2
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-1958 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and passed
that body
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
______________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
__________________________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.